Utah statutes.
76-10-1104.   Gambling promotion.

(1)  A person is guilty of gambling promotion if he derives or intends to derive an economic benefit other than personal winnings from gambling and:

(a)  he induces or aids another to engage in gambling; or

(b)  he knowingly invests in, finances, owns, controls, supervises, manages, or participates in any gambling.

(2)  Gambling promotion is a class B misdemeanor, provided, however that any person who is twice convicted under this section shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree.



Amended by Chapter 241, 1991 General Session

